District of Columbia statutes.
29-1103

Relation to other law.

A statute governing a specific type of unincorporated nonprofit association shall prevail over an inconsistent provision in this chapter, to the extent of the inconsistency.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 3 of the Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Act (2008 Act).